data/grammar/fst/phonology.xfscript
! Cumulative phonology rules for doc/dev/plans/fst-analyzer-plan.md's FST prototype,
! composed with lexicon.lexc's concatenation. Grows one rule at a time,
! alongside the lexicon, in a single file rather than one file per
! mechanism.
!
! A bare "/" is avoided in tags throughout lexicon.lexc specifically because
! it's this file's replace-rule context operator ("a -> b / c _ d" fails to
! parse; xfst wants "||" there instead -- confirmed by testing), so putting
! "/" inside a tag would collide with rules written here.
!
! Build steps (three, not one, since the bulk root/affix/demonstrative
! generators were added):
!   1. hfst-lexc -o combined-lexicon.hfst lexicon.lexc roots-generated.lexc
!      suffixes-generated.lexc endings-generated.lexc
!      demonstratives-generated.lexc (xfst's own `read lexc` command only
!      accepts a single file -- see lexicon.lexc's own header -- so the
!      hand-authored lexicon and the generate_*.py outputs
!      (generate_roots.py, generate_affixes.py -> suffixes-/endings-generated,
!      generate_demonstratives.py) are combined by the standalone hfst-lexc
!      tool, which *does* accept multiple input files, before this script
!      ever runs. hfst-lexc prints a few "Sublexicon is mentioned but not
!      defined" warnings for the not-yet-wired *GeneratedSpeculative ending
!      paths -- expected, not fatal.)
!   2. hfst-xfst -F phonology.xfscript
!      (loads that combined lexicon, composes it with the rules below, and
!      saves the combined *generator* transducer -- analysis+tags in, final
!      surface out -- to lexicon-generator.hfst.)
!   3. hfst-invert -i lexicon-generator.hfst -o lexicon-analyser.hfst, then
!      hfst-fst2fst -w -i lexicon-analyser.hfst -o lexicon-analyser.hfstol
!      for the fast optimized-lookup format hfst-lookup actually queries.
!      MUST be -w (--optimized-lookup-weighted), NOT -O
!      (--optimized-lookup-unweighted, this project's own build commands
!      used throughout up to and including this rule) -- confirmed the
!      hard way while adding the LENIENT rule below: -O silently discards
!      the strict/lenient weight distinction (every path prints
!      "0.000000" regardless of its real weight in the un-optimized
!      .hfst), while -w preserves it correctly. Harmless before this
!      rule existed (every path really was weight 0), but load-bearing
!      now.

load stack combined-lexicon.hfst
define Lexicon ;
read regex Lexicon

! "juq"/1vn ("amittuq", see lexicon.lexc's comment in VnSuffixes):
! Suffixes.csv's "juq" (1vn) row gives one deterministic surface candidate
! per preceding-context column (V->juq, t->tuq, k->tuq, q->tuq) -- the
! suffix-initial "j" surfaces as "t" when immediately preceded by a stem
! ending in t, k, or q, and stays "j" after a vowel. Expressible directly
! as a plain context-restriction rule, with the preceding letter itself as
! the trigger -- no invisible boundary marker needed (unlike the
! gemination case investigated and rejected early on, where the trigger
! wasn't otherwise recoverable from the surface string alone). Extended to
! also trigger after "r" once "liuq"/1nv's "liur" spelling variant needed
! it ("maligaliurti" needs "ji"/1vn's j to surface as t after "liur" the
! same way it already does after a literal t/k/q-final stem).
  .o. [ j -> t || [ t | k | q | r ] _ ]

! JGUARD marker (see generate_roots.py's own comment on protect_internal_j
! for the full investigation): the j->t rule above is blanket/context-blind
! -- it was meant for a SUFFIX's own initial j (e.g. juq/1vn) after a
! t/k/q/r-final STEM, but with no boundary information available to an
! xfst replace rule, it also silently fired on t/k/q/r-before-j sequences
! INSIDE a root's own literal spelling (root-internal clusters are
! lexically fixed, never subject to this alternation) -- confirmed via
! "tikirarjuaq" (a place name) generating as corrupted "tikirartuaq".
! generate_roots.py now inserts JGUARD between the trigger consonant and
! "j" for every root containing this pattern; deleted here, immediately
! after the one rule it exists to block, so it never reaches the final
! surface and can't interact with anything later in the cascade.
  .o. [ JGUARD -> 0 ]

! SUPPR marker (see lexicon.lexc's comment on "liri"/1nv in NvSuffixes for
! the original investigation): consonant-deletion before the SUPPR marker
! lexicon.lexc inserts right before certain suffixes' literal text.
! Deletes whatever consonant immediately precedes that marker, then a
! second rule deletes the marker itself so it never reaches the final
! surface form. Marker-based (not a blanket phonetic rule) because the
! deletion is a lexical property of specific suffixes (their own CSV row
! carries Action.Suppression in that context), not a general Inuktitut
! sound change. Generalized from "delete a preceding q" to "delete a
! preceding q, k, or t" once "qai"'s own CSV row (see lexicon.lexc's
! comment on "ilaak"/1e) turned out to delete a preceding K the same way
! "liri"'s row deletes a preceding Q -- Action.Suppression is the same
! mechanism regardless of which final consonant it deletes.
  .o. [ [ q | k | t ] -> 0 || _ SUPPR ]
  .o. [ SUPPR -> 0 ]

! DECAP marker (see lexicon.lexc's comment on "it"/tn-nom-p in NounEndings
! for the full investigation): deletes "it"'s own leading "i" specifically
! when the segment immediately before the marker is two vowels (mirrors
! VVNG's shape below but deletes instead of inserts, and checks the LEFT
! context of the marker rather than gating an insertion after it). Runs
! after SUPPR's cleanup, since the two-vowel check needs to see the stem
! AFTER any q/k/t deletion already applied, not before.
  .o. [ i -> 0 || [ a | e | i | o | u ] [ a | e | i | o | u ] DECAP _ ]
  .o. [ DECAP -> 0 ]

! VVNG marker (see lexicon.lexc's comment on "u"/1nv in NvSuffixes for the
! full investigation): vowel-gated epenthesis rather than a
! consonant-triggered change -- "ng" is inserted before the VVNG marker
! lexicon.lexc puts right before "u"'s own text, but only when the two
! segments immediately preceding that marker are both vowels (confirmed
! algorithmic, not corpus-disambiguated, same rigor as tn-nom-p's
! Selfdecapitation case above). Runs after the SUPPR-deletion rules
! above, not before: for a k/q-final stem ("piliriaq"), the q must
! already be gone before checking whether the *remaining* stem ends in
! two vowels.
  .o. [ 0 -> n g || [ [ a | e | i | o | u ] [ a | e | i | o | u ] ] _ VVNG ]
  .o. [ VVNG -> 0 ]

! NASAL marker (see lexicon.lexc's comment on "niq"/2vn in VnSuffixes for
! the full investigation): unlike SUPPR (delete) and VVNG (insert), this
! REWRITES the preceding stem's final consonant: k->"ng", q->"r",
! immediately before the marker. Confirmed deterministic by tracing
! Roman.nasalOfOcclusiveUnvoicedLat in the source analyzer.
  .o. [ k -> n g || _ NASAL ]
  .o. [ q -> r || _ NASAL ]
  .o. [ NASAL -> 0 ]

! General (unmarked) total-regressive-assimilation rules -- a consonant
! assimilates to an immediately-following consonant, confirmed general
! and systematic (Action.Assimilation recurs in hundreds of CSV rows), so
! unlike SUPPR/NASAL/etc above these need no marker: the trigger is
! simply the literal following letter, same pattern as the j->t rule at
! the top of this file. t->n first appeared for "kkut"->"kkun" before
! "nut" (see lexicon.lexc's comment on "aanniaqtulirijikkunnut" in
! NounEndings); k->t for "quviattunga" (root "quviak"'s own final k
! assimilating to junga's already-transformed initial "t", see
! generate_affixes.py's investigation note on "junga"/tv-ger-1s); p->t
! for "qaujimagapta"->"qaujimagatta" (see generate_affixes.py's note on
! "gapta"/tv-caus-1p) -- each checked for collisions via
! full_corpus_check.py before being added as a blanket rule, not just
! assumed safe.
  .o. [ t -> n || _ n ]
  .o. [ k -> t || _ t ]

! KGUARD marker (same shape as JGUARD above, mirrored for the k->t rule
! just above instead of the j->t rule): "qulluktuq" (a bulk-generated
! spelling VARIANT of root "kugluktuk", from RootsSpalding.csv's own
! "variant" column) has its own internal "k" immediately before its own
! "t", which the blanket k->t rule silently corrupts into "qulluttuq"
! -- confirmed via direct hfst-lookup before wiring. Unlike JGUARD
! (inserted automatically by generate_roots.py's protect_internal_j()
! for every root matching that pattern), KGUARD is hand-inserted here
! for just this one word: the k->t collision is far rarer within root
! spellings than the j->t one was, so a bulk sweep isn't warranted
! yet -- revisit as a systemic generator fix if more examples turn up.
  .o. [ KGUARD -> 0 ]
  .o. [ p -> t || _ t ]

! PMARK marker (see lexicon.lexc's comment on "vunga"/tv-dec-1s in
! TvEndings for the full investigation): two rules -- the suffix's own
! initial "v" rewrites to "p" after t/k, then (a separate effect) a
! preceding stem's final "k" assimilates to that same "p". Marker-scoped
! rather than blanket letter rules specifically because "makpiq" (a
! lexicon root, see generate_affixes.py's investigation note on "gaq"/1vn)
! has its own internal "kp" cluster that must NOT be affected.
  .o. [ v -> p || [ t | k ] _ PMARK ]
  .o. [ k -> p || _ p PMARK ]
  .o. [ PMARK -> 0 ]

! VOICE marker (see lexicon.lexc's comment on "vik"/3vn in VnSuffixes for
! the full investigation): implements Action.Voicing (CSV code "son") --
! t->l, k->g, q->r, rewriting the PRECEDING stem's own final consonant,
! same "marker scoped, rewrite not delete" shape as NASAL above but a
! DIFFERENT letter table (confirmed by reading
! Roman.voicedOfOcclusiveUnvoicedLat in the source analyzer, as opposed to
! NASAL's nasalOfOcclusiveUnvoicedLat) -- q happens to map to "r" in BOTH
! tables, but t/k differ (l/g vs n/ng), so VOICE genuinely needs its own
! marker, not a NASAL alias.
  .o. [ t -> l || _ VOICE ]
  .o. [ k -> g || _ VOICE ]
  .o. [ q -> r || _ VOICE ]
  .o. [ VOICE -> 0 ]

! MINSERT marker (see lexicon.lexc's comment on "mat"/tv-caus-4s in
! TvEndings for the full investigation): inserts "m" when the immediately
! preceding segment is a vowel -- shaped like VVNG's insertion above
! (same "epenthesis gated by what precedes" idea) but NOT a VVNG alias:
! VVNG's own condition is specifically two preceding vowels, and this
! rule is needed after a single preceding vowel too ("summat"), so it
! needs its own condition and its own marker.
  .o. [ 0 -> m || [ a | e | i | o | u ] _ MINSERT ]
  .o. [ MINSERT -> 0 ]

! t->m/k->m: two more members of the same general (unmarked)
! total-regressive-assimilation family as t->n/k->t/p->t/m->n/k->n --
! this project's modelling of Benoit's Action.Assimilation (Action.kt:
! the stem's final consonant becomes the following affix's initial). A
! consonant assimilating to a following "m" is as systematic as to a
! following "n" or "t"; these entered when a t-/k-final stem first met an
! m-initial affix ("qanuimmat"/"taimaimmat" for t->m, "uqsualummut" for
! k->m), not as patches for those words. Placed LAST among the
! assimilation rules, after MINSERT/NASAL markers resolve, so they only
! fire once the affix's own literal "m" is truly adjacent to the
! preceding stem's final letter.
  .o. [ t -> m || _ m ]
  .o. [ k -> m || _ m ]

! m->n: one more sibling in the same family. "mnik"/tn-acc-s-1s and
! "mnut"/tn-dat-s-1s (Pronouns.csv's "uva"/1rpr root, see lexicon.lexc's
! comment there) spell their own leading "m" immediately before their
! own "n" ("mnik"="m"+"nik", "mnut"="m"+"nut") -- "uva"+"mnik" needs
! that "m" to assimilate to the following "n", giving "uvannik" (not
! "uvamnik"). Same total-regressive-assimilation shape as t->m/k->m
! above, just the source/target pair swapped.
  .o. [ m -> n || _ n ]
